Tables/Contraction/de-wort.cti
###############################################################################
# BRLTTY - A background process providing access to the console screen (when in
#          text mode) for a blind person using a refreshable braille display.
#
# Copyright (C) 1995-2025 by The BRLTTY Developers.
#
# BRLTTY comes with ABSOLUTELY NO WARRANTY.
#
# This is free software, placed under the terms of the
# GNU Lesser General Public License, as published by the Free Software
# Foundation; either version 2.1 of the License, or (at your option) any
# later version. Please see the file LICENSE-LGPL for details.
#
# Web Page: http://brltty.app/
#
# This software is maintained by Dave Mielke <dave@mielke.cc>.
###############################################################################

# BRLTTY Contraction Subtable - German (contracted)

# Prefixes ending with -a
sufword klima =
sufword pharma 1234-125-356-134-1
sufword propaganda 12345-1234-1-1245-235-145-1
sufword prostata 12345-23456-1-2345-1
sufword yoga =

begword aal = shouldn't use the al-contraction
sufword aar =
sufword saar =
sufword saat =
always aargau 1-1-1235-1245-16 shouldn't use the ar-contraction
always account =
always afrika =
always afrikaner 1-124-1235-24-13-235-12456
always afrikanisch 1-124-1235-24-13-235-24-156
always afrikanist 1-124-1235-24-13-235-24-23456
always afrikanistisch 1-124-1235-24-13-235-5-156

prfword aktie =
always aktien 1-13-2345-24-14
always aldehyd 25-145-15-125-6-13456-145
always alemann 25-15-134-235-1345 shouldn't use the el-contraction
always alkohol 25-13-135-125-135-123
sufword alpha 25-1234-125-1
always aluminium 25-136-134-35-24-136-134

always antisozial 235-2345-24-234-123
always arhythm =
always atelier 1-2345-13456-24-12456

before hilmnrsu always aufnahme 2-16-1345-134-15
prfword aufnahmen 2-16-1345-134-14
before t always ausbeu 16-234-12-126 shouldn't use the be-contraction
before t always austrit 16-234-2345-1235-24-2345 shouldn't use the st-contraction

always abballer 1-12-12-1-12345-12456 shouldn't use the aller-contraction
sufword baller 12-1-12345-12456 shouldn't use the aller-contraction
always abbeiz 1-12-12-146-1356 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always abbettel 1-12-23-2345-2345-13456 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always ableismus 1-12-123-15-5-24 shouldn't use the ei-contraction
before e always ablöse =
before hilmnrsu always abnahme 1-12-1345-134-15
prfword abnahmen 1-12-1345-134-14
always absolvent 1-12-234-135-123-1236-14-2345
always achilles 1-1456-24-12345-123456
begword achtel 1-1456-2345-13456 shouldn't use the te-contraction

always schachtel 156-56-2345-13456 shouldn't use the te-contraction

always akkordeon 1-13-13-26-145-15-135-1345 Akkordeonist shouldn't use the nis-contraction
always altersteilzeit 25-2345-12456-234-2345-146-123-1356-2345
always alteurop 25-2345-126-1235-135-1234
always sampel 234-1-134-1234-13456
before cost always amts = shouldn't use the sch-contraction
begmidword anachron 235-1-1456-1235-135-1345
always analyse 235-25-6-13456-234-15
prfword analysen 235-25-6-13456-234-14
always analysenauf 235-25-6-13456-234-14-2-16
always analysenergeb 235-25-6-13456-234-14-12456-12346-12
before konsonant always analysen 235-25-6-13456-234-14
always apostroph 1-1234-135-23456-1235-135-1234-125 apostrophier shouldn't use the hier-contraction
always angeber 235-12346-12-12456 shouldn't use the be-contraction

always anzeigenummer 235-1356-146-12346-1345-136-1346-12456
always anzeigeröhr 235-1356-146-12346-1235-246-125-1235


always abonnement 1-12-135-1345-1345-15-134-14-2345
always agreement 1-1245-1235-15-15-134-14-2345
always amüsement 1-134-1256-234-15-134-14-2345
always appartement 1-1234-1234-356-236-134-14-2345
always bombardement 12-135-134-12-356-145-15-134-14-2345
always etablissement 15-2345-1-12-123-24-2346-15-134-14-2345
always implement 24-134-1234-123-15-134-14-2345
always inkrement 35-13-1235-15-134-14-2345
before t always komplemen 13-135-134-1234-123-15-134-14
always konnossement 13-135-1345-1345-135-2346-15-134-14-2345
before t always reglemen 1235-15-1245-123-15-134-14
before t always temperamen 2345-12356-1234-12456-1-134-14

always arbeitgeber 356-12-12346-12-12456 shouldn't use the be-contraction
always auftraggeber 2-16-2345-1245-12346-12-12456
always dienstgeber 145-346-1345-23456-12346-12-12456
always gastgeber 1245-1-23456-12346-12-12456
always gesetzgeber 12346-2-15-12346-12-12456
always herausgeber 125-12456-16-234-12346-12-12456
always impulsgeber 24-134-1234-136-123-234-12346-12-12456
always namensgeber 1345-1-134-14-234-12346-12-12456
always zeitgeber 1356-2345-12346-12-12456

always anrainen 235-1235-1-24-1345-14 shouldn't use the in-contraction
always anrainer 235-1235-1-24-1345-12456 shouldn't use the in-contraction
always arthrose 356-2345-125-1235-135-234-15
prfword arthrosen 356-2345-125-1235-135-234-14
before e always arzteh 356-1356-2345-2356
sufword apostel 1-1234-135-23456-13456 Apostellöffel shouldn't use the stell-contraction
always aqua =
always ligaquali 123-45-1-6-12345-25-24
sufword armeleute 356-134-15-123-126-236
always autoreifen 16-2345-135-1235-146-124-14
always autorück 16-2345-135-1235-46
always ägypten 345-1245-6-13456-1234-2345-14 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always ämpter 345-134-2345-12456 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always aegypten 345-1245-6-13456-1234-2345-14
always audienz 16-145-24-14-1356 shouldn't use the ie-contraction
always aufgaben 2-16-1245-1-12-14
prfword bachelor 12-1-1456-13456-135-1235
begmidword bachelor 12-1-1456-13456-26
before hilmnrsu always bade =
prfword baden 12-1-145-14
prfword badend 12-1-145-14-145
prfword badende 12-1-145-14-145-15
prfword badendem 12-1-145-14-145-12356
prfword badenden 12-1-145-14-145-14
prfword badender 12-1-145-14-145-12456
prfword badendes 12-1-145-14-145-123456
prfword bades 12-1-145-123456

always bacterium 12-1-6-14-2345-12456-24-136-134 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always bakteri 12-1-13-2345-12456-24 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always deuterium 145-126-2345-12456-24-136-134 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always basis =
prfword basisch 12-1-234-24-156
prfword basische 12-1-234-24-156-15
prfword basischem 12-1-234-24-156-12356
prfword basischen 12-1-234-24-156-14
prfword basischer 12-1-234-24-156-12456
prfword basisches 12-1-234-24-156-123456


always baufabrik 12-16-124-1-12-1235-24-13 shouldn't use the auf-contraction
always baufahr 12-16-2-1235
always baufieber 12-16-124-346-12-12456 shouldn't use the auf-contraction
always baufirma 12-16-124-24-1235-134-1
always baufirmen 12-16-124-24-1235-134-14
always beamten 23-1-134-2345-14 shouldn't use the te-contraction
word beat =
always beatbox =
always beatmusik 12-15-1-2345-134-13
always beatnik =
always backbeat 12-1-46-12-15-1-2345
word offbeat = Sauerstoffbeatmung
always popbeat =
always rockbeat 1235-135-46-12-15-1-2345

always befund 23-124-256-145
always behindert 23-125-35-145-12456-2345
prfword behinderte 23-125-35-145-12456-236
always beicht 12-146-1456-2345
prfword beichte 12-146-1456-236
prfword beichtest 12-146-1456-236-23456
prfword beichtet 12-146-1456-236-2345
prfword beichtete 12-146-1456-236-236
prfword gebeichtetem 12346-12-146-1456-236-2345-12356
prfword beichteten 12-146-1456-236-2345-14
prfword gebeichteter 12346-12-146-1456-236-2345-12456
prfword gebeichtetes 12346-12-146-1456-236-2345-123456
prfword beichtetest 12-146-1456-236-236-23456
prfword beichtetet 12-146-1456-236-236-2345
sufword beidreh 2-12-145-1235-2356 shouldn't use the beid-contraction

sufword bein 12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
prfword bein 12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
prfword beine 12-1246-15 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
prfword beines 12-1246-123456 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
prfword beins 12-1246-234 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always beinchen 12-1246-1456-14
always beindex 23-35-145-15-6-1346
always beinheit 12-1246-125
always beinricht 12-1246-2-3456
always beinsetz 12-1246-2-15
always beinstell 12-1246-2-13456
always beinteil 12-1246-2345-146-123
always beinterview 23-35-2345-12456-1236-24-15-2456
always einbein 1246-12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always zweibein 1356-2456-146-12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always dreibein 145-1235-146-12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always vierbein 1236-346-1235-12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always fünfbein 124-1256-1345-124-12-1246
always sechsbein 234-15-1456-234-12-1246
always achtbein 1-1456-2345-12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always bauchbein 12-16-1456-12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always beidbein 12-145-12-1246
always breitbein 12-1235-146-2345-12-1246
always brustbein 12-1235-136-23456-12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always dackelbein 145-1-46-13456-12-1246
always drachenbein 145-1235-56-14-12-1246
always drahtbein 145-1235-1-125-2345-12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always drehbein 145-1235-2356-12-1246
always dünnbein 145-1256-1345-1345-12-1246
always eisbein 146-234-12-1246
before st begword eis 146-234
always elfenbein 13456-124-14-12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always telfenbein 2345-13456-124-14-12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always federbein 124-15-145-12456-12-1246
always felsenbein 124-13456-234-14-12-1246
always fersenbein 124-12456-234-14-12-1246
always fischbein 124-24-156-12-1246
always fliegenbein 124-123-346-1245-14-12-1246
always gaumenbein 1245-16-134-14-12-1246
always grätschbein 1245-1235-345-2345-156-12-1246
always hinterbein 125-35-2345-12456-12-1246
always hirnbein 125-24-1235-1345-12-1246
always hochbein 125-135-1456-12-1246
always holzbein 125-135-123-1356-12-1246
always hufbein 125-136-124-12-1246
always hüftbein 125-1256-124-2345-12-1246
always hühnerbein 125-1256-125-1345-12456-12-1246
always jochbein 245-135-1456-12-1246
always keilbein 13-146-123-12-1246
always kreuzbein 13-1235-126-1356-12-1246
always krummbein 13-1235-136-1346-12-1246
always kurzbein 13-1356-12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always langbein 123-1245-12-1246
always laufbein 123-16-124-12-1246
always mittelbein 134-2345-12-1246
always nasenbein 1345-1-234-14-12-1246
always raucherbein 1235-16-1456-12456-12-1246
always rinderbein 1235-35-145-12456-12-1246
always schambein 156-1-134-12-1246
always schienbein 156-346-1345-12-1246
always sitzbein 2-24-12-1246
always spielbein 2-346-12-1246
always spinnenbein 234-1234-35-1345-14-12-1246
always spreizbein 234-1234-1235-146-1356-12-1246
always sprungbein 234-1234-1235-256-1245-12-1246
always standbein 2-23456-12-1246
always steifbein 23456-146-124-12-1246
always steißbein 23456-146-6-2346-12-1246
always stirnbein 23456-24-1235-1345-12-1246
always stuhlbein 23456-136-125-123-12-1246
always tischbein 2345-24-156-12-1246
always überbein 2-1256-12-1246
always vielbein 1236-123-12-1246
always vorderbein 2-26-145-12456-12-1246
always wadenbein 2456-1-145-14-12-1246
always zahnbein 1356-1-125-1345-12-1246
always zungenbein 1356-256-1245-14-12-1246

prfword zunge 1356-256-12346 shouldn't use the ung-contraction
prfword zungen 1356-256-1245-14 shouldn't use the ung-contraction
before g always hirschzun 125-24-1235-156-1356-245
before g always katzenzun 13-1-2345-1356-14-1356-256
before g always langzun 123-1245-1356-256
before g always mittelzun 134-2345-1356-256
before g always seezun 234-15-15-1356-256
